Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1674
Employee; penalized due to jury service; prohibited; penalty.

Any person who is summoned to serve on jury duty shall not be subject to discharge from employment, loss of pay, loss of sick leave, loss of vacation time, or any other form of penalty as a result of his or her absence from employment due to such jury duty upon giving reasonable notice to his or her employer of such summons. Any person who is summoned to serve on jury duty shall be excused upon request from any shift work for those days required to serve as a juror without loss of pay. No employer shall subject an employee to discharge, loss of pay, loss of sick leave, loss of vacation time, or any other form of penalty on account of his or her absence from employment by reason of jury duty, except that an employer may reduce the pay of an employee by an amount equal to any compensation, other than expenses, paid by the court for jury duty. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 17;

Laws 1980, LB 733, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1640;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 31.